Louisiana, session 2026, HB366.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:2135(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2135. Temporary restraining order
* * *
E. If the hearing pursuant to Subsection B or D of this Section is continued,
the court shall make or extend such temporary restraining orders as it deems
necessary. Any continuance of a hearing ordered pursuant to Subsection B or D of
this Section shall not exceed one period of fifteen days, unless good cause is shown
for further continuance. If the defendant has not been served and fails to appear at
the hearing pursuant to Subsection B or D of this Section, the hearing may be
continued and reset within twenty-one days from the date of service of the petition.
Any order made or extended pursuant to this Subsection shall remain in effect until
the hearing.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-863 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 366